DI-703
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIATU-01

DTC B1163/82 Short in Curtain Shield Squib RH

Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The curtain shield squib RH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the curtain shield airbag as-
sembly RH.

It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.

DTC B1163/82 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the curtain shield squib RH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
e Short in curtain shield squib RH circuit (to B+) « Curtain shield airbag assembly RH (Curtain shield squib RH)
B1163/82 ¢ Curtain shield squib RH malfunction « Airbag sensor assembly
* Airbag sensor assembly malfunction * Floor No. 2 wire
HINT:

DTC B1163/82 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-693.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check floor No. 2 wire (curtain shield squib RH circuit).

ON  Floor No.2 Wi PREPARATION:
ooro. e Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery, and wait
:| _ at least for 2 seconds.
Curtain Shield Airbag CHECK:
Squib RH Sensor o _
Assembly (a) Turntheignition switchto ON.
C[l :l (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and ICR+

of the floor No. 2 wire connector on the curtain shield air-

@
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% bag assembly RH (curtain shield squib RH) side.
OK:
% ICR+ Voltage: Below 1V
Qe
1
—Y

Hgroro = ) (+) NG> Repair or replace floor No. 2 wire.
H16277 H16621
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Floor No. 2 Wire

Curtain Shield Airbag
Squib RH Sensor

C[l ; ]Assembly
/]

H01020
H16278 AB0119
H10600 H11643

H21145
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PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(d) Using a service wire, connect ICR+ and ICR- of the floor
No. 2 wire connector on the curtain shield airbag assem-
bly RH (curtain shield squib RH) side.

(e) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
DTCB 1163/82is notoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1163/82 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check curtain shield squib RH.

Curtain Shield :l Airbag

Squib RH Sensor
[I:I :l Assembly
ON
DLC3 DTC B1163/82
) =
LA
CG TC
HO01021 ABO119
H10600 H11643 H13063

@

PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the curtain shield airbag assembly RH (curtain
shield squib RH) connector.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:

DTCB 1163/82is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1163/82 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

(curtain shield squib RH).

NG> Replace curtain shield airbag assembly RH

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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